Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB524.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Video Camera Surveillance in Child-Care Centers Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child care." Care in lieu of parental care given for part of a 24-hour day to a child under 16 years of age away from the child's home. The term does not include care in lieu of parental care given to a child under 16 years of age in a place of worship during religious services."Child-care center." Any premises in which child care is 123456789101112131415161718 provided simultaneously for seven or more children who are not relatives of the provider, regardless of which article of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, applies to it."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth.Section 3. Video camera surveillance systems.(a) Duty to install and maintain.--A child-care center shall install and maintain video camera surveillance systems that meet or exceed the specifications established by regulation of the department.(b) Regulations.--The department shall promulgate regulations that provide specifications for video camera surveillance systems in child-care centers and standards for the use of the systems.(c) Inspections.--The department may conduct inspections of child-care centers to investigate compliance with this act.Section 4. Applicability.This act shall apply to child-care centers that commence operations after the effective date of this section.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0524PN0516 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122